Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF589.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1181SV (2) 91 sb/js S.F. 589 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 331.465A Solid waste collection and 1 disposal services ââ opt-out. 2 1. A county board of supervisors shall allow a real 3 property owner to opt out of using county-provided solid waste 4 collection and disposal services when these services are 5 provided to the real property owner by a different entity. A 6 property owner that opts out of county-provided solid waste 7 collection and disposal services shall not be charged any fees 8 associated with such services from the county. 9 2. An application shall be filed by a real property 10 owner who opts out of solid waste collection and disposal 11 services for each property for which an opt-out is sought. 12 After the initial application, the opt-out shall continue 13 for the property unless the real property owner opts back in 14 to receiving solid waste collection and disposal services or 15 if title to the opted-out property changes from the name of 16 the person or entity originally opting out of solid waste 17 collection and disposal services. 18 3. The board of supervisors shall approve the application 19 unless the information provided is not satisfactory under this 20 section. 21 4. Applications for an opt-out shall be made on forms 22 provided by the county and shall, at a minimum, contain 23 information verifying the property will receive or has been 24 receiving an alternate solid waste collection and disposal 25 service. Applications may be submitted in person, by mail, or 26 through a submission process on the countyâs internet site, if 27 applicable. 28 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 384.84B Solid waste collection and 29 disposal services ââ opt-out. 30 1. A city council shall allow a real property owner to opt 31 out of using city-provided solid waste collection and disposal 32 services when these services are provided to the real property 33 owner by a different entity. A property owner that opts out 34 of city-provided solid waste collection and disposal services 35 -1- LSB 1181SV (2) 91 sb/js 1/ 3 S.F. 589 shall not be charged any fees associated with such services 1 from the city. 2 2. An application shall be filed by a real property 3 owner who opts out of solid waste collection and disposal 4 services for each property for which an opt-out is sought. 5 After the initial application, the opt-out shall continue 6 for the property unless the real property owner opts back in 7 to receiving solid waste collection and disposal services or 8 if title to the opted-out property changes from the name of 9 the person or entity originally opting out of solid waste 10 collection and disposal services. 11 3. The city council shall approve the application unless the 12 information provided is not satisfactory under this section. 13 4. Applications for an opt-out shall be made on forms 14 provided by the city and shall, at a minimum, contain 15 information verifying the property will receive or has been 16 receiving an alternate solid waste collection and disposal 17 service. Applications may be submitted in person, by mail, or 18 through a submission process on the cityâs internet site, if 19 applicable. 20